Massachusetts, session 194th, H5039.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding any special or general law to the contrary, the 
Massachusetts Merged Market Advisory Council, hereinafter, Council, is hereby established to 
advise the governor and lieutenant governor regarding the merged market for insured health 
coverage that is regulated under chapter 176J of the General Laws, and to propose 
recommendations to ensure the affordability of insured health benefit plan products offered 
therein and the long-term stability of coverage for individuals and small employers in the merged 
market.  
SECTION 2. The Council shall consist of no more than 13 members. The speaker of the 
house and the senate president shall each appoint five members from outside of government with 
experience in and knowledge of the health insurance industry, including members representing 
the perspective of carriers, brokers, actuaries, and individual purchaser representatives, as well as 
persons representing small businesses.  

of 4 13  The Council shall also include the commissioner of the division of insurance, who shall 
serve as chair, the secretary of the executive office of health and human services or her designee, 
and the executive director of the commonwealth health insurance connector authority, all of 
whom shall serve as members of the Council ex officio. Each member shall serve without 
compensation and in an advisory capacity.  
SECTION 3.  The Council’s principal purposes shall be to prepare a report that 
summarizes the most recent data pertaining to the merged market based on an independent 
actuarial analysis and that makes recommendations for improved market functioning, including 
any policy and legislative changes that the Council recommends to ensure affordability and 
stability of coverage for small businesses and individuals. The Council shall oversee an update to 
the independent actuarial analysis of the merged market utilized in the final report of the Merged 
Market Advisory Council created by Executive Order Number 589.  
In formulating the recommendations, the Council shall consider and address:  
1. The general stability of the merged market risk pool;  
2. Trends and dynamics related to the composition of the merged market risk pool and its 
impact on premiums and affordability for small businesses and individuals and how those trends 
and composition have changed over time;  
3. Drivers of health care costs and premiums and growth of health care costs and 
premiums in the merged market;  
4. The presence or extent of any cross-subsidization between the non-group and small 
group market segments; ii) the role of federal risk adjustment; and iii) the impact of emerging 

of 4 34 coverage options for small-employers including, but not limited to, association health plans, 
multiple employer welfare arrangements, professional employer organizations, individual 
coverage health reimbursement arrangements and self-insurance;  
5. Policy or market dynamics that threaten the stability of the overall market for small 
group and individual coverage, or are forecasted to do so; 
6. Strategies to strengthen and promote affordability for the small group market, 
including but not limited to, whether federal waivers should be sought to permit flexibility in the 
application of merged market rules; and 
7. Other opportunities to improve the functioning of the merged market including, but 
not limited to, the establishment of a reinsurance program; provided, however, that the Council 
must consider the impact of such strategies on both the non-group and small group market 
segments and potential state and federal costs and funding sources.  
SECTION 4. The Council shall be supported by staff from the division of insurance, the 
executive office of health and human services, and the commonwealth health insurance 
connector. The Council also may utilize outside resources to conduct independent actuarial 
analysis and other consulting services as necessary to support its recommendations.  
SECTION 5. The Council may determine the procedures appropriate for conducting its 
proceedings. The Council is authorized to hold public meetings, fact-finding hearings, and other 
public forums to solicit feedback and request data from outside experts, policymakers, business 
organizations, carriers, consumers, advocates, and other interested persons. The Council shall 
consider information received from these sources in the development of its recommendations.  

of 4 55  SECTION 6. The Council shall submit a final report with recommendations to the 
governor not later than December 31, 2026.  
SECTION 7. The Council shall terminate upon submission of the final report or six 
months after the signing of this order, whichever comes later.